Florida, session 2026, HB461.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 97.0291, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
97.0291 Prohibition on use of private funds for election-
related expenses.—
(1) An No agency or a state or local official responsible
for conducting elections, including, but not limited to, a
supervisor of elections, may not solicit, accept, use, or
dispose of any donation in the form of money, grants, property,
or personal services from an individual or a nongovernmental
entity for the purpose of funding any type of expenses related
to election administration, including, but not limited to, voter
education, voter outreach, voter registration programs, or the
cost of any litigation related to election administration.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb461 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 461 2026 Legislature
(2) This section does not prohibit:
(a) The donation and acceptance of space to be used for a
polling room or an early voting site.
(b) High school students in this state who are registered
or preregistered to vote from volunteering to assist poll
workers for the purpose of receiving community service hours
that may be counted toward meeting community service
requirements for high school graduation and community service
requirements for participation in a scholarship program.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb461 -01-er